Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.331

Name—Registered agent.

(1) A foreign limited liability company may register with the secretary of state under any name that complies with RCW 23.95.525 and Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) Each foreign limited liability company must continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(3) A foreign limited liability company may change its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change in accordance with RCW 23.95.430.

(4) A registered agent of a foreign limited liability company may change its information on file with the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.435 or 23.95.440.

(5) A registered agent of any foreign limited liability company may resign as agent by executing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7119; 2015 c 188 s 65.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.